Utah statutes.
75-5-416.   Petitions for orders subsequent to appointment.

(1) Any person interested in the welfare of a person for whom a conservator has been appointed may file a petition in the appointing court for an order:

(a)  Requiring bond or security or additional bond or security, or reducing bond;

(b)  Requiring an accounting for the administration of the trust;

(c)  Directing distribution;

(d)  Removing the conservator and appointing a temporary or successor conservator; or

(e)  Granting other appropriate relief.

(2)  A conservator may petition the appointing court for instructions concerning his fiduciary responsibility.

(3)  Upon notice and hearing the court may give appropriate instructions or make any appropriate order.

